Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 191, O.S.L.


2025 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 291.4), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 291.4. A. There is hereby created the Statewide


Official Compensation Commission.


B. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall consist


of the same persons who constitute the Board on Legislative


Compensation as provided by Section 21 of Article V of the Oklahoma


Constitution.





Req. No. 2627 Page 1


C. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall be


authorized to meet only on the same date as the Board on Legislative


Compensation.


D. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall set the


salary for each of the following elected officials:


1. The Governor;


2. The Lieutenant Governor;


3. The Attorney General;


4. The State Treasurer;


5. The State Auditor and Inspector;


6. The Superintendent of Public Instruction;


7. The State Insurance Commissioner;


8. The Commissioner of Labor; and


9. The members of the Oklahoma Corporation Commission.


E. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall not set


the salary for any of the officials identified in subsection D of


this section at an amount less than the salary in effect for such


officials as of January 1, 2025.


F. At its authorized meeting, the Statewide Official


Compensation Commission shall set the salary for each of the


officials identified in subsection D of this section for any term of


office for such officials beginning on or after the date as of which


the Commission sets the salary amount.



Req. No. 2627 Page 2


G. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall not


modify a salary amount in violation of the requirements of Section


of Article XXIII of the Oklahoma Constitution.


H. Pursuant to Section 23 of Article V of the Oklahoma


Constitution, no attempted adjustment adopted by the Statewide


Official Compensation Commission shall operate to increase the


emoluments of any office for which a current member of the


Legislature is elected or appointed. Any such office shall retain


the emoluments in effect prior to the attempted adjustment adopted


by the Commission.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2627 MSBB 1/12/2026 9:33:55 AM























Req. No. 2627 Page 3